Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB49.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Cannabis 20250SB0049PN1506 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Control Board Act.Section 102. Definitions.The words and phrases used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.CHAPTER 2(RESERVED)CHAPTER 3CANNABIS CONTROL BOARDSection 301. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the Cannabis Control Board.Section 302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." The Cannabis Control Board established under section 303(a)."Cannabis." As follows:(1) Any of the following:(i) Marijuana, hashish or other substances that are identified as including any parts of the plant cannabis sativa and including derivatives or subspecies, such as indica, of all strains of cannabis, whether growing or not, including the seeds, resin extracted from any part of the plant and any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of the plant. The term includes THC and all other naturally produced cannabinol derivatives, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction, including delta-7 THC, delta-8 THC, delta-9 20250SB0049PN1506 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THC or any structural, optical or geometric isomers of tetrahydrocannabinol, cannabis flower, concentrate, edible and infused products.(ii) A product intended for human consumption with a THC concentration, however derived, greater than the allowable THC limit specified in the Medical Marijuana Act."CANNABIS." AS FOLLOWS:(1) ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) MARIJUANA, HASHISH OR OTHER SUBSTANCES THAT ARE IDENTIFIED AS INCLUDING ANY PARTS OF THE PLANT CANNABIS SATIVA AND INCLUDING DERIVATIVES OR SUBSPECIES, SUCH AS INDICA, OF ALL STRAINS OF CANNABIS, WHETHER GROWING OR NOT, INCLUDING THE SEEDS, RESIN EXTRACTED FROM ANY PART OF THE PLANT AND ANY COMPOUND, MANUFACTURE, SALT, DERIVATIVE, MIXTURE OR PREPARATION OF THE PLANT. THE TERM INCLUDES THC AND ALL OTHER NATURALLY PRODUCED CANNABINOL DERIVATIVES, WHETHER PRODUCED DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY BY EXTRACTION, INCLUDING DELTA-7 THC, DELTA-8 THC, DELTA-9 THC OR ANY STRUCTURAL, OPTICAL OR GEOMETRIC ISOMERS OF TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL, CANNABIS FLOWER, CONCENTRATE, EDIBLE AND INFUSED PRODUCTS.(II) A PRODUCT INTENDED FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION WITH A THC CONCENTRATION, HOWEVER DERIVED, THAT IS A HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCT AND IS EXCLUDED FROM THE DEFINITION OF "HEMP" UNDER THIS SECTION.(III) AN INTERMEDIATE HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCT WHICH IS MARKETED OR SOLD AS A FINAL PRODUCT OR DIRECTLY TO AN END CONSUMER FOR PERSONAL OR HOUSEHOLD USE.20250SB0049PN1506 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The term does not include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant or any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of the mature stalks, the sterilized seed of the plant that is incapable of germination or industrial hemp as defined in 3 Pa.C.S. § 702 (relating to definitions). OR INDUSTRIAL HEMP."Cannabis organization." A medical marijuana organization as defined in the Medical Marijuana Act."CONTAINER." THE INNERMOST WRAPPING, PACKAGING OR VESSEL IN DIRECT CONTACT WITH A FINAL HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCT IN WHICH THE FINAL HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCT IS ENCLOSED FOR RETAIL SALE TO CONSUMERS, SUCH AS A JAR, BOTTLE, BAG, BOX, PACKET, CAN, CARTON OR CARTRIDGE. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE BULK SHIPPING CONTAINERS OR OUTER WRAPPINGS THAT ARE NOT ESSENTIAL FOR THE FINAL RETAIL DELIVERY OR SALE TO AN END CONSUMER FOR PERSONAL OR HOUSEHOLD USE."FINAL HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCT." A HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCT THAT IS IN THE FINAL FORM OR PREPARATION MARKETED OR INTENDED TO BE USED OR CONSUMED BY A HUMAN OR ANIMAL. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE AN INTERMEDIATE HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCT."HEMP." THE PLANT CANNABIS SATIVA L. AND ANY PART OF THAT PLANT, INCLUDING THE SEEDS THEREOF AND ALL DERIVATIVES, EXTRACTS, CANNABINOIDS, ISOMERS, ACIDS, SALTS AND SALTS OF ISOMERS, WHETHER GROWING OR NOT, WITH A TOTAL TETRAHYDROCANNABINOLS CONCENTRATION, INCLUDING TETRAHYDROCANNABINOLIC ACID, OF NOT MORE THAN 0.3% ON A DRY WEIGHT BASIS. THE TERM:(1) INCLUDES INDUSTRIAL HEMP.20250SB0049PN1506 - 5 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) DOES NOT INCLUDE:(I) ANY VIABLE SEEDS FROM A CANNABIS SATIVA L. PLANT THAT EXCEEDS A TOTAL TETRAHYDROCANNABINOLS CONCENTRATION, INCLUDING TETRAHYDROCANNABINOLIC ACID, OF 0.3% IN THE PLANT ON A DRY WEIGHT BASIS;(II) ANY INTERMEDIATE HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCTS CONTAINING:(A) CANNABINOIDS THAT ARE NOT CAPABLE OF BEING NATURALLY PRODUCED BY A CANNABIS SATIVA L. PLANT;(B) CANNABINOIDS THAT:(I) ARE CAPABLE OF BEING NATURALLY PRODUCED BY A CANNABIS SATIVA L. PLANT; AND(II) WERE SYNTHESIZED OR MANUFACTURED OUTSIDE THE PLANT; OR(C) MORE THAN 0.3% COMBINED TOTAL OF:(I) TOTAL TETRAHYDROCANNABINOLS, INCLUDING TETRAHYDROCANNABINOLIC ACID; AND(II) ANY OTHER CANNABINOIDS THAT HAVE SIMILAR EFFECTS, OR ARE MARKETED TO HAVE SIMILAR EFFECTS, ON HUMANS OR ANIMALS AS A TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL AS DETERMINED BY THE BOARD;(III) ANY INTERMEDIATE HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCTS WHICH ARE MARKETED OR SOLD AS A FINAL PRODUCT OR DIRECTLY TO AN END CONSUMER FOR PERSONAL OR HOUSEHOLD USE; OR(IV) ANY FINAL HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCTS CONTAINING:(A) CANNABINOIDS THAT ARE NOT CAPABLE OF BEING NATURALLY PRODUCED BY A CANNABIS SATIVA L. PLANT;(B) CANNABINOIDS THAT:20250SB0049PN1506 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (I) ARE CAPABLE OF BEING NATURALLY PRODUCED BY A CANNABIS SATIVA L. PLANT; AND(II) WERE SYNTHESIZED OR MANUFACTURED OUTSIDE THE PLANT; OR(C) GREATER THAN 0.4 MILLIGRAMS COMBINED TOTAL PER CONTAINER OF:(I) TOTAL TETRAHYDROCANNABINOLS, INCLUDING TETRAHYDROCANNABINOLIC ACID; AND(II) ANY OTHER CANNABINOIDS THAT HAVE SIMILAR EFFECTS, OR ARE MARKETED TO HAVE SIMILAR EFFECTS, ON HUMANS OR ANIMALS AS A TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL AS DETERMINED BY THE BOARD."HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCT." THE FOLLOWING:(1) ANY INTERMEDIATE OR FINAL PRODUCT DERIVED FROM HEMP, OTHER THAN INDUSTRIAL HEMP, THAT:(I) CONTAINS CANNABINOIDS IN ANY FORM; AND(II) IS INTENDED FOR HUMAN OR ANIMAL USE THROUGH ANY MEANS OF APPLICATION OR ADMINISTRATION, SUCH AS INHALATION, INGESTION OR TOPICAL APPLICATION.(2) THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE A DRUG THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF AN APPLICATION APPROVED UNDER 21 U.S.C. § 355(C) OR (J) (RELATING TO NEW DRUGS)."INDUSTRIAL HEMP." HEMP:(1) GROWN FOR THE USE OF THE STALK OF THE PLANT, FIBER PRODUCED FROM SUCH A STALK OR ANY OTHER NON-CANNABINOID DERIVATIVE, MIXTURE, PREPARATION OR MANUFACTURE OF SUCH A STALK;(2) GROWN FOR THE USE OF THE WHOLE GRAIN, OIL, CAKE, NUT, HULL OR ANY OTHER NON-CANNABINOID COMPOUND, DERIVATIVE, MIXTURE, PREPARATION OR MANUFACTURE OF THE SEEDS OF SUCH 20250SB0049PN1506 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PLANT;(3) GROWN FOR PURPOSES OF PRODUCING MICROGREENS OR OTHER EDIBLE HEMP LEAF PRODUCTS INTENDED FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION THAT ARE DERIVED FROM AN IMMATURE HEMP PLANT THAT IS GROWN FROM SEEDS THAT DO NOT EXCEED THE THRESHOLD FOR TOTAL TETRAHYDROCANNABINOLS CONCENTRATION SPECIFIED IN THE DEFINITION OF "HEMP";(4) THAT IS A PLANT THAT DOES NOT ENTER THE STREAM OF COMMERCE AND IS INTENDED TO SUPPORT HEMP RESEARCH AT AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION AS DEFINED IN 20 U.S.C. § 1001 (RELATING TO GENERAL DEFINITION OF INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION) OR AN INDEPENDENT RESEARCH INSTITUTE; OR(5) GROWN FOR THE USE OF A VIABLE SEED OF THE PLANT PRODUCED SOLELY FOR THE PRODUCTION OR MANUFACTURE OF ANY MATERIAL."INTERMEDIATE HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCT." A HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCT WHICH:(1) IS NOT YET IN THE FINAL FORM OR PREPARATION MARKETED OR INTENDED TO BE USED OR CONSUMED BY A HUMAN OR ANIMAL; OR(2) IS A POWDER, LIQUID, TABLET, OIL OR OTHER PRODUCT FORM WHICH IS INTENDED OR MARKETED TO BE MIXED, DISSOLVED, FORMULATED OR OTHERWISE ADDED TO OR PREPARED WITH OR INTO ANY OTHER SUBSTANCE PRIOR TO ADMINISTRATION OR CONSUMPTION."Medical Marijuana Act." The act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act."Ownership interest." Owning or holding, or being deemed to hold, debt or equity securities or other ownership interest or profit interest."THC." A delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and any structural, optical or geometric isomers of tetrahydrocannabinol, including 20250SB0049PN1506 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 delta-7, delta-8 and delta-10 tetrahydrocannabiphorol, hexahydrocannabinol and any other substance, however derived, that has similar effects on the mind or body as determined by the board."TRANSACTION SCAN DEVICE." A DEVICE CAPABLE OF DECIPHERING, IN AN ELECTRONICALLY READABLE FORMAT, THE INFORMATION ENCODED ON THE MAGNETIC STRIP OR BAR CODE OF A STATE-ISSUED IDENTIFICATION CARD.Section 303. Establishment of board.(a) Board established.--The Cannabis Control Board is established as an independent board which shall be a body corporate and politic.(b) Membership.--The board shall consist of the following members:(1) Three members appointed by the Governor.(2) One member appointed by each of the following:(i) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(ii) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(iii) The Minority Leader of the Senate.(iv) The Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(c) Removal.--A member of the board shall be removed from office by the appointing authority:(1) for misconduct in office, willful neglect of duty or conduct evidencing unfitness for office or incompetence; or(2) upon conviction of an offense graded as a felony, an infamous crime, an offense under the Medical Marijuana Act or an equivalent offense under Federal law or the law of another jurisdiction.(d) Initial appointments to board.--20250SB0049PN1506 - 9 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Gubernatorial appointees initially appointed under subsection (b)(1) shall serve an initial term of one, two and three years respectively as designated by the Governor at the time of appointment and until their successors are appointed and qualified.(2) Legislative appointees initially appointed under subsection (b)(2) shall serve until the third Tuesday in January 2027 and until their successors are appointed and qualified.(3) An appointment to fill a vacancy created by a member appointed in accordance with paragraph (1) or (2) shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term.(e) Terms of office.--Upon the expiration of a term of a member appointed under subsection (d), the following shall apply:(1) The term of office of a gubernatorial appointee shall be three years and until a successor is appointed and qualified.(2) The term of office of a legislative appointee shall be two years and until a successor is appointed and qualified.(3) A gubernatorial appointee shall serve no more than two full consecutive terms.(4) A legislative appointee shall serve no more than three full consecutive terms.(5) An appointment to fill a vacancy shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term.(6) A member appointed to fill a vacancy under paragraph (3) may serve two full terms following the expiration of the term related to the vacancy.20250SB0049PN1506 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) A member appointed to fill a vacancy under paragraph (4) may serve three full terms following the expiration of the term related to the vacancy.(f) Ex officio members.--The Secretary of Agriculture, the Secretary of Health, the Attorney General and the Pennsylvania State Police Commissioner, or their designees, shall serve on the board as nonvoting ex officio members of the board. The designee shall be a deputy secretary or an equivalent position within the agency.(g) Executive director of the board.--Within seven days of the effective date of this subsection, the Governor shall nominate an interim executive director. The Governor's nominee shall be subject to Senate confirmation and the Senate shall hold the confirmation vote within seven days of the nomination. If the Senate fails to hold the confirmation vote within seven days of nomination, the Senate shall be deemed to have confirmed the nominee. If the Senate rejects the nominee, the Governor shall have five days to nominate a second proposed interim executive director and the Senate shall have five days after the nomination to hold a confirmation vote. If the Senate fails to hold a confirmation vote within five days of the nomination, the Senate shall be deemed to have confirmed the nominee. If the Senate rejects the nominee, the Governor shall have three days to nominate a third proposed interim executive director and the Senate shall have three days after the nomination to hold a confirmation vote. The process for the third proposed interim director shall continue until an interim executive director is confirmed by the Senate. The following shall apply:(1) The interim executive director may be the permanent executive director and shall not be prohibited from 20250SB0049PN1506 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employment with the board in any other position.(2) Between the effective date of this paragraph and when the board is fully constituted, staffed and operational, it is the intent of the General Assembly for regulated materials and regulated activities to be administered by the interim executive director on a temporary basis.(3) The interim executive director and executive director shall be considered employees of the board for compensation purposes.(h) Background investigation.--Appointees shall be subject to a background investigation conducted by the Pennsylvania State Police in accordance with this chapter.(i) Qualifications and restrictions.--(1) Each member at the time of appointment shall be at least 25 years of age and shall have been a resident of this Commonwealth for a period of at least one year immediately preceding appointment. Each member shall continue to remain a resident of this Commonwealth during the term of membership on the board.(2) Except for ex officio members, a person may not be appointed a member of the board or be employed by or be an independent contractor of the board if that individual is a public official or party officer, as those terms are defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1512 (relating to financial and employment interests), in this Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions.(3) Each member, employee and independent contractor of the board shall sign an agreement to not disclose confidential information.(4) A member, employee or independent contractor of the 20250SB0049PN1506 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board or another agency having regulatory authority over the board or cannabis organizations may not be employed, hold any office or position or be engaged in any activity which is incompatible with the position, employment or contract.(5) A member may not engage in any business, employment or vocation for which the member receives a salary, compensation or fee for services rendered which is in excess of 15% of the member's gross annual salary as a member of the board. For purposes of this paragraph, the terms "salary," "compensation" and "fee" do not include any of the following:(i) Passive or unearned income, including interest, dividends or capital gains from the sale of assets or securities held for investment purposes.(ii) Health care benefits or retirement, pension or annuity payments.(iii) Amounts received from a family-controlled trade or business in which both personal services and capital are income-producing factors, provided that the personal services actually rendered by the member do not generate a significant amount of income.(iv) Director's fees attributable to board membership of a corporate or nonprofit body or board or reimbursement for expenses incurred in connection with board membership.(6) A member may not be paid or receive any fee or other compensation for any activity related to the duties or authority of the board other than the salary and expenses provided by law.(7) A member, employee or independent contractor of the board may not participate in a hearing, proceeding or other 20250SB0049PN1506 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 matter in which the member, employee or independent contractor, or an immediate family member thereof, has a financial interest in the subject matter of the hearing or proceeding or other interest that could be substantially affected by the outcome of the hearing or proceeding without first fully disclosing the nature of the interest to the board and other persons participating in the hearing or proceeding. The board shall determine if the interest is a disqualifying interest that requires the disqualification or nonparticipation of an employee or independent contractor. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "immediate family" shall mean a spouse, parent, brother, sister or child.(8) At the time of appointment and annually thereafter, each member shall disclose the existence of any financial interest in any applicant, permitted entity, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company thereof held by the member or known to be held by the member's immediate family. The disclosure statement shall be filed with the executive director of the board and with the appointing authority for the member and shall be open to inspection by the public at the office of the board during the normal business hours of the board for the duration of the member's term and for two years after the member leaves office. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "immediate family" shall mean a spouse, parent, brother, sister or child.(9) Prior to being sworn as a member, an appointee and the appointee's immediate family shall divest any financial interest in any applicant, permitted entity, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company thereof owned or held by the 20250SB0049PN1506 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appointee or known to be held by the appointee's immediate family. For the duration of the member's term and for one year thereafter, the member and the member's immediate family may not acquire a financial interest in any applicant, permitted entity, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company thereof. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "immediate family" shall mean a spouse and any minor or unemancipated child.(10) Prior to entering into employment or a contract with the board and annually thereafter, an employee or independent contractor shall disclose the existence of any financial interest in any applicant, permitted entity, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company thereof owned or held by the employee or independent contractor or known to be held by the immediate family of the employee or independent contractor. The disclosure statement shall be filed with the board and shall be open to inspection by the public at the office of the board during the normal business hours of the board and for two years after termination of employment or a contract with the board. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "immediate family" shall mean a spouse, parent, brother, sister or child.(11) Prior to entering into employment or contracting with the board, an employee or independent contractor and the employee's or independent contractor's immediate family shall divest any financial interest in any applicant, permitted entity, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company thereof, owned or held by the employee or independent contractor or known to be held by the immediate family of the employee or independent contractor. For the duration of the employee's 20250SB0049PN1506 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employment with the board or the independent contractor's contract with the board and for one year thereafter, the employee or independent contractor and the immediate family thereof shall not acquire, by purchase, gift, exchange or otherwise, any financial interest in any applicant, or permitted entity, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company thereof. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "immediate family" shall mean a spouse and any minor or unemancipated child.(12) A member, employee or independent contractor of the board may not directly or indirectly solicit, request, suggest or recommend to any applicant, permitted entity, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company thereof or to any principal, employee, independent contractor or agent thereof, the appointment or employment of any person in any capacity by the applicant, permitted entity, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company thereof for a period of two years from the termination of term of office, employment or contract with the board.(13) A member may not accept employment with any applicant, permitted entity or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company thereof for a period of two years from the termination of term of office.(14) A former member may not appear before the board in any hearing or proceeding or participate in any other activity on behalf of any applicant, permitted entity or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or permitted entity, or any other permittee, for a period of two years from the termination of term of office.(15) A member who has been convicted during the member's 20250SB0049PN1506 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 term in any domestic or foreign jurisdiction of a felony criminal offense related to the manufacture, delivery or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance in violation of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, shall, upon conviction, be automatically removed from the board and shall be ineligible to become a member in the future. If an ex officio member is convicted during the ex officio member's term in any domestic or foreign jurisdiction of a felony criminal offense related to the manufacture, delivery or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance in violation of The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, the ex officio member shall, upon conviction, be automatically removed from the board, and a designee shall be designated under subsection (f) to serve the remainder of the ex officio member's term.(16) The following shall apply to an employee of the board whose duties substantially involve licensing, enforcement, development of law, promulgation of regulations or development of policy relating to cannabis or who has other discretionary authority which may affect or influence the outcome of an action, proceeding or decision, including the executive director, bureau directors and attorneys:(i) The individual may not, for a period of two years following termination of employment, accept employment with or be retained by an applicant or permitted entity or by an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or permitted entity.20250SB0049PN1506 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The individual may not, for a period of two years following termination of employment, appear before the board in any hearing or proceeding or participate in any activity on behalf of any applicant, permittee or permitted entity or on behalf of an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of any applicant, permittee or permitted entity.(iii) An applicant or a permitted entity or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or a permitted entity may not, until the expiration of two years following termination of employment, employ or retain the individual. Violation of this subparagraph shall result in termination of the individual's employment and subject the violator to penalties determined by the board.(iv) A prospective employee who, upon employment, would be subject to this paragraph must, as a condition of employment, sign an affidavit that the prospective employee will not violate subparagraph (i) or (ii). If the prospective employee fails to sign the affidavit, the board shall rescind any offer of employment and may not employ the individual.(17) The following shall apply to an independent contractor and to an employee of an independent contractor whose duties substantially involve consultation relating to licensing, enforcement, development of law, promulgation of regulations or development of policy, relating to cannabis:(i) The person may not, for a period of one year following termination of the contract with the board, be retained by an applicant or a permitted entity or by an 20250SB0049PN1506 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or a permitted entity.(ii) The person may not, for a period of two years following termination of the contract with the board, appear before the board in a hearing or proceeding or participate in activity on behalf of any applicant, permittee or permitted entity or on behalf of an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of any applicant, permittee or permitted entity.(iii) An applicant or a permitted entity or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or a permittee may not, until the expiration of one year following termination of the contract with the board, employ or retain the person. A knowing violation of this subparagraph shall result in termination of the person's employment and subject the violator to penalties determined by the board.(iv) Each contract between the board and an independent contractor which involves the duties provided under this paragraph shall contain a provision requiring the independent contractor to sign an affidavit that the independent contractor will not violate subparagraph (i) or (ii). If the independent contractor fails to sign the affidavit, the board may not enter into the contract.(v) An independent contractor shall require a prospective employee whose employment would involve the duties provided under this paragraph to sign an affidavit that the prospective employee will not violate subparagraph (i) or (ii). If the prospective employee fails to sign the affidavit, the independent contractor 20250SB0049PN1506 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall rescind any offer of employment and may not employ the individual.(18) Nothing under paragraph (16) or (17) shall prevent a current or former employee of the board, a current or former independent contractor or a current or former employee of an independent contractor from appearing before the board in any hearing or proceeding as a witness or testifying as to any fact or information.(19) The State Ethics Commission shall issue a written determination of whether a person is subject to paragraph (16) or (17) upon the written request of the person or the person's employer or potential employer. A person that relies in good faith on a determination issued under this paragraph shall not be subject to any penalty for an action taken, provided that all material facts provided in the request for the determination are correct.(20) The State Ethics Commission shall publish a list of all employment positions within the board and employment positions within independent contractors whose duties would subject the individuals in those positions to the provisions of paragraphs (16) and (17). The board and each independent contractor shall assist the State Ethics Commission in the development of the list, which shall be transmitted by the State Ethics Commission to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin biennially and posted by the board on the board's publicly accessible Internet website. Upon request, employees of the board and each independent contractor shall have a duty to provide the State Ethics Commission with adequate information to accurately develop and maintain the list. The State Ethics 20250SB0049PN1506 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commission may impose a civil penalty under 65 Pa.C.S. § 1109(f) (relating to penalties) upon an individual who fails to cooperate with the State Ethics Commission under this paragraph. An individual who relies in good faith on the list published by the State Ethics Commission shall not be subject to any penalty for a violation of paragraph (16) or (17).(21) If a member of the board violates any provision of this section, the appointing authority may remove the individual from the board. A member removed under this paragraph shall, for a period of five years following removal, be prohibited from future appointment to the board and shall be prohibited from applying for a permit or other authorization under the Medical Marijuana Act and from becoming an independent contractor or registering as a permitted entity representative.(j) Fiduciary relationship.--A member or employee of the board shall serve as a fiduciary of the Commonwealth.(k) Standard of care.--Members shall exercise the standard of care required by 20 Pa.C.S. Ch. 73 (relating to municipalities investments) in the performance of their duties under this chapter.(l) Liability.--Members shall not be personally liable for any of the following:(1) Obligations of the board.(2) Actions which were within the scope of their office and made in good faith.(m) Compensation.--(1) The Executive Board as established in the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, shall establish the compensation of the 20250SB0049PN1506 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 members.(2) Members shall be reimbursed for all necessary and actual expenses.(3) Members shall be eligible for retirement under the State Employees' Retirement Code and shall, if the member elects to participate, be considered a State employee for the purposes of 71 Pa.C.S. Pt. XXV (relating to retirement for State employees and officers).(n) Chairperson.--The chairperson of the board shall be selected by a majority vote of appointed and qualified members.(o) Appointments.--The appointing authorities shall make their initial appointments within 30 days of the effective date of this subsection. Appointments to fill a vacancy shall be made within 30 days of the creation of the vacancy. No appointment shall be final until receipt by the appointing authority of the required background investigation of the appointee by the Pennsylvania State Police which shall be completed within 15 days. A person who has been convicted in any domestic or foreign jurisdiction of a felony, infamous crime or gaming offense may not be appointed to the board.(p) Prohibition against nepotism.--A member may not solicit, request, suggest or recommend the employment by the board of any individual related within the second degree of consanguinity to the member as provided in 23 Pa.C.S. § 1304(e) (relating to restrictions on issuance of license) or the spouse of the individual.(q) Employment requirements.--(1) Prospective employees shall submit an application and a personal disclosure form to the board which shall include a complete criminal history, including convictions 20250SB0049PN1506 - 22 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and current charges for all felonies and misdemeanors.(2) Prospective employees shall be required to undergo testing which detects the presence of illegal substances in the body.(3) The board shall obtain fingerprints and photographs for each prospective employee consistent with the standards adopted by the Pennsylvania State Police.(4) The board shall verify the identification, employment and education of each prospective employee, including:(i) Legal name, including any alias.(ii) All educational institutions attended regardless of graduation status.(iii) Places of residence for the past 10 years.(iv) Employment history for the past 15 years.(5) The board may not hire a prospective employee if the prospective employee:(i) has been convicted of a crime that bears a close relationship to the duties and responsibilities of the position for which employment is sought;(ii) has been dismissed from other employment for gross misconduct; or(iii) has intentionally made a false statement concerning a material fact in connection with the application to the board.(6) The board may not employ a person unless the requirements of paragraphs (1), (2), (3) and (4) have been met. This paragraph shall apply only to persons employed after the effective date of this paragraph.(7) The board shall:20250SB0049PN1506 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Immediately refer any criminal matter involving an employee to law enforcement.(ii) Develop a disciplinary process for an employee charged with a crime or with gross misconduct.(iii) Immediately suspend from employment any employee charged with a felony.(iv) Develop a process to discipline all other instances of misconduct.(8) Disciplinary action shall be instituted promptly against an employee who, while on or off duty, engages in serious misconduct which may bring the board into disrepute.(r) Budgetary impasse.--If, in the event of a budgetary or other fiscal crisis, the Governor orders the furlough of Commonwealth employees, the board and its employees whose duties involve the regulation and oversight of cannabis shall not be subject to furlough and shall continue to perform their duties of employment.(s) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Financial interest." An ownership, property, leasehold or other beneficial interest in a cannabis organization. The term does not include an interest which is held or deemed to be held in any of the following:(1) Securities that are held in a pension plan, profit-sharing individual retirement account, tax-sheltered annuity, a plan established under 26 U.S.C. § 457 (relating to deferred compensation plans of State and local governments and tax-exempt organizations), deferred compensation plan whether qualified or not qualified under 26 U.S.C. (relating 20250SB0049PN1506 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to Internal Revenue Code) or other retirement plan that:(i) is not self-directed by the individual; and(ii) is advised by an independent investment adviser who has sole authority to make investment decisions with respect to contributions made by the individual to these plans.(2) A tuition account plan organized and operated under 26 U.S.C. § 529 (relating to qualified tuition programs) that is not self-directed by the individual.(3) A mutual fund where the interest owned by the mutual fund in a cannabis organization does not constitute a controlling interest.Section 304. Code of conduct.(a) Scope.--The board shall adopt a comprehensive code of conduct prior to the consideration of any permit or registration application. The code of conduct shall supplement all other requirements under the Medical Marijuana Act and 65 Pa.C.S. Pt. II (relating to accountability) and shall provide guidelines applicable to members, employees, independent contractors of the board and the immediate families of the members, employees and independent contractors to enable them to avoid any perceived or actual conflict of interest and to promote public confidence in the integrity and impartiality of the board. At a minimum, the code of conduct adopted under this section shall include restrictions under subsection (b).(b) Restrictions.--A member of the board shall:(1) Not accept any discount, gift, gratuity, compensation, travel, lodging or other thing of value, directly or indirectly, from any applicant, permittee or any representative thereof.20250SB0049PN1506 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Disclose and disqualify the member from any proceeding in which the member's objectivity, impartiality, integrity or independence of judgment may be reasonably questioned due to the member's relationship or association with a party connected to any proceeding or a person appearing before the board.(3) Refrain from any financial or business dealing which would tend to reflect adversely on the member's objectivity, impartiality or independence of judgment.(4) Not hold or campaign for public office, hold an office in any political party or political committee, contribute to or solicit contributions to a political campaign, party, committee or candidate, publicly endorse a candidate or actively participate in a political campaign.(5) Not solicit funds for any charitable, educational, religious, health, fraternal, civic or other nonprofit entity from an applicant, cannabis organization, subsidiary, intermediary or holding company of a cannabis organization, interested party or cannabis organization representative.(6) Not meet or engage in discussions with any applicant, permitted entity or a cannabis organization representative unless the meeting or discussion occurs on the business premises of the board and is recorded in a log maintained for this purpose. The log shall be available for public inspection during the regular business hours of the board. This paragraph shall not apply to meetings of the board to consider matters requiring the physical inspection of the equipment or premises of an applicant or a cannabis organization at their location.(7) Avoid impropriety and the appearance of impropriety 20250SB0049PN1506 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 at all times and observe standards and conduct that promote public confidence in the oversight of cannabis.(8) Comply with any other laws, rules or regulations relating to the conduct of a member.(c) Ex officio members.--The restrictions under subsection (b)(5) shall not apply to ex officio members.Section 305. Applicability of other statutes.(a) Applicability to board.--The board shall be subject to the following acts:(1) The act of July 19, 1957 (P.L.1017, No.451), known as the State Adverse Interest Act.(2) The act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(3) The provisions of 65 Pa.C.S. Chs. 7 (relating to open meetings) and 11 (relating to ethics standards and financial disclosure).(b) Status of board.--(1) The board shall be considered an independent agency for the purposes of the following:(i) The act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(ii) 62 Pa.C.S. Pt. I (relating to Commonwealth Procurement Code). The expediting of the payment of revenue to the Commonwealth shall not be grounds for an emergency procurement by the board.(2) The board shall be considered an agency for the purposes of the following:(i) The act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(ii) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), 20250SB0049PN1506 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 known as the Regulatory Review Act.Section 306. Board meetings.(a) Meetings.--(1) The board shall meet at the call of the chairperson.(2) The board and each advisory committee or subcommittee of the board shall meet as often as deemed necessary. NOT LESS THAN TWO TIMES PER MONTH.(2) ADVISORY COMMITTEES OR SUBCOMMITTEES OF THE BOARD SHALL MEET AS OFTEN AS DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE BOARD.(3) Within 30 days of the appointment of the initial members of the board, the board shall conduct its first meeting.(b) Designees.--In the case of absence of the chairperson during a meeting of the board, the chairperson of the board may designate another member to serve as a substitute chairperson for the meeting.(c) Quorum.--(1) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum of the board for the purpose of organizing the authority and conducting official business.(2) Only members of the board who are physically present at a meeting of the board or able to participate fully in the deliberations by appropriate telecommunications means shall count toward a quorum of the board.(3) If a quorum is not present, a hearing of the board may still take place.(d) Qualified majority vote.--(1) Except as permitted in paragraphs (2) and (3), any action, including the approval, issuance, denial or conditioning of any permit by the board or the making of any 20250SB0049PN1506 - 28 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 order or the ratification of any permissible act done or order made by one or more of the members, shall require a qualified majority vote consisting of at least one gubernatorial appointee and the four legislative appointees.(2) Any action to suspend or revoke, not renew, void or require forfeiture of a permit, to impose any administrative fine or penalty or to issue cease and desist orders or similar enforcement actions shall require a majority vote of all the members appointed to the board.(3) In addition to the provisions of this chapter or 65 Pa.C.S. § 1103(j) (relating to restricted activities), a member shall disclose the nature of the member's disqualifying interest, disqualify the member and abstain from voting in a proceeding under this chapter in which the member's objectivity, impartiality, integrity or independence of judgment may be reasonably questioned, as provided in section 304(b)(7). If a legislative appointee has disqualified themself, the qualified majority shall consist of all the remaining legislative appointees and at least two gubernatorial appointees.Section 307. Board records.(a) Record of proceedings.--The board shall cause to be made and kept a record of all proceedings held at public meetings of the board. The verbatim transcript of the proceedings shall be the property of the board and shall be prepared by the board upon the request of any board member or upon the request of any other person and the payment by that person of the costs of preparation.(b) Applicant information delivered to Governor and General Assembly under the Medical Marijuana Act.--20250SB0049PN1506 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The board shall maintain a list of all applicants for permits. The list shall include a record of all actions taken with respect to each applicant. The list shall be open to public inspection during the normal business hours of the board.(2) Information under paragraph (1) regarding any applicant whose permit has been denied, revoked or not renewed shall be removed from the list after seven years from the date of the action.(c) Other files and records.--The board shall maintain other files and records as it may deem appropriate.(d) Confidentiality of information.--All information submitted by an applicant or obtained by the board as part of a background investigation from any source shall be considered confidential. Except as necessary to carry out the criminal history investigation specified under this chapter, the information shall be withheld from public disclosure in whole or in part, except that any information shall be released upon the lawful order of a court of competent jurisdiction or, with the approval of the Attorney General, to a duly authorized law enforcement agency or shall be released to the public, in whole or in part, to the extent that the release is requested by an applicant and does not otherwise contain confidential information about another person. The board may not require an applicant to waive any confidentiality provided for in this subsection as a condition for the approval of a permit or any other action of the board. Any person who violates this subsection shall be administratively disciplined by discharge, suspension or other formal disciplinary action as the board deems appropriate.20250SB0049PN1506 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Notice.--Notice of the contents of any information, except to a duly authorized law enforcement agency under this section, shall be given to any applicant or permittee in a manner prescribed by the rules and regulations adopted by the board.(f) Information held by department.--Files, records, reports and other information in the possession of the department pertaining to permits shall be made available to the board as may be necessary to the effective administration of this chapter.Section 308. Regulations.(a) Temporary regulation.--The board shall promulgate temporary regulations no later than 90 days from the effective date of this subsection. The temporary regulations under this subsection shall expire not later than two years after the effective date of this subsection and shall not be subject to any of the following:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(3) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(a.1) Failure to promulgate regulations.--If the board fails to promulgate regulations under subsection (a), regulations promulgated under the Medical Marijuana Act shall apply.20250SB0049PN1506 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Compliance deadline.--A current cannabis organization on the effective date of this subsection that is authorized to cultivate, process, dispense or transport cannabis shall have 90 days from the effective date of a new temporary regulation promulgated by the board under subsection (a) to comply with the temporary regulation.(c) Regulations.--The board shall promulgate regulations, with input from stakeholders, to implement the provisions of this chapter, including all of the following:(1) Regulation of unregulated cannabis products that are sold at unpermitted locations.(1) REGULATION OF CANNABIS AND ALL ITS DERIVATIVES.(2) ENFORCEMENT PROCEDURES FOR CANNABIS AND ALL ITS DERIVATIVES.(2) (3) The types of permits issued by the board.(3) (4) The methods and forms of permit applications, including timeline, fees and minimum requirements.(4) The policies and procedures to prioritize, promote and encourage diversity and full participation by individuals from communities that have been disproportionately harmed by cannabis prohibition and cannabis enforcement prohibition.(5) Procedures to process and competitively score permit applications.(6) Procedures to process administrative requests, including changes of ownership and location.(7) Security procedures for cannabis organizations.(8) Enforcement procedures, including fines, suspensions and revocations.(9) Ownership and financial disclosure procedures and requirements for cannabis organizations, including record 20250SB0049PN1506 - 32 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 keeping requirements.(10) Procedures and requirements concerning the divestiture of a beneficial ownership interest by a person found unqualified.(11) Procedures, processes and requirements for transfers of ownership, including the involvement of a publicly traded corporation.(12) Seed-to-sale tracking system procedures. The system shall be the record or a secondary electronic tracking system used by a cannabis organization or testing laboratory that meets all of the following criteria:(i) The system shall capture everything that happens to a cannabis plant from seed and cultivation through the growth, harvest and manufacturing of cannabis, including testing and transportation, to final sale.(ii) The system shall use unique plant identification and unique batch identification.(iii) The system shall track the involvement of an agent or permittee with cannabis products.(iv) The system shall integrate with a secondary system used by a cannabis organization or a cannabis testing facility, if applicable, in a form and manner determined by the board.(v) The system shall allow for two-way communication, automation and a secure application-programming interface with a cannabis organization's enterprise resource planning, inventory, accounting and point-of-sale software.(vi) The system shall include a secure application program interface capable of accessing all data required 20250SB0049PN1506 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to be transmitted to the board to ensure compliance with the operational reporting requirements specified under this chapter and any regulations promulgated by the board.(vii) The board and the board's contracted seed-to-sale vendor shall allow cannabis business establishments to utilize any enterprise resource planning, inventory, accounting and point-of-sale software of the cannabis business establishment's choosing, provided that the systems must integrate through application-programming interface to the State's seed-to-sale software.(viii) The board's contracted seed-to-sale vendor may not offer point-of-sale services to a cannabis business establishment.(VIII) THE BOARD SHALL NOT REQUIRE CANNABIS BUSINESS ESTABLISHMENTS TO UTILIZE THE BOARD'S CONTRACTED SEED-TO-SALE VENDOR AS A POINT-OF-SALE-SYSTEM.(13) Procedures and requirements for curbside pickup services offered by dispensing organizations.(14) Transportation requirements, including:(i) Establishing procedures and requirements for home delivery services by dispensing organizations and micro cultivation centers. AND THIRD-PARTY TRANSPORTERS.(ii) A requirement that transportation between cannabis organizations occurs in secured vehicles but allowing for transportation in vehicles other than those owned and operated by cannabis organizations for purchasers to transport cannabis.(iii) Details required on transportation manifests.(iv) Policies encouraging bulk shipment where 20250SB0049PN1506 - 34 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appropriate.(v) Requirements relating to shipping containers and packaging.(vi) The manner in which trucks, vans, trailers or other carriers will be secured.(vii) Security systems that include a numbered seal on the trailer.(viii) Obtaining copies of drivers' licenses and registrations and other information related to security and tracking.(ix) Use of GPS systems.(x) Number of drivers or other security required to ensure against storage or in-transit losses.(xi) Recordkeeping for delivery and receipt of medical cannabis products.(xii) Storing of cannabis temporarily at fulfillment centers operated by third-party contractors contracted by cultivation centers for transporting cannabis. A third-party contractor may not hold a permit issued by the board or be otherwise affiliated with a cannabis organization or laboratory.(15) Labeling requirements.(XI) RECORDKEEPING FOR DELIVERY AND RECEIPT OF CANNABIS PRODUCTS.(XII) PROCEDURES FOR STORING CANNABIS TEMPORARILY AT WAREHOUSING AND DISTRIBUTION PERMIT HOLDER FACILITIES.(15) LABELING REQUIREMENTS CONSISTENT WITH INDUSTRY BEST PRACTICES, INCLUDING:(I) STANDARD SYMBOLS AND WARNINGS WHERE THE BOARD SHALL REVIEW SYMBOLS FROM OTHER JURISDICTIONS WHERE 20250SB0049PN1506 - 35 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CANNABIS SALES ARE PERMITTED. AS NATIONAL STANDARDS ARE AVAILABLE, THE BOARD SHALL PLAN TO ADOPT NATIONAL STANDARDS.(II) AN ITEMIZATION, INCLUDING WEIGHT OF ALL CANNABINOID AND TERPENE INGREDIENTS SPECIFIED FOR THE PRODUCT. THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH MAY BE SATISFIED THROUGH THE USE OF ELECTRONIC QR CODES AS PRESCRIBED BY THE BOARD.(16) Advertising and marketing regulations that balance the ability of a cannabis organization to engage in reasonable marketing and promotional activities that are not directed at minors to promote the use of cannabis.(17) Product safety regulations, including:(i) Regulations consistent with best practices for food products, except where necessary modifications are required due to the active compounds in the cannabis plant.(ii) Standards for packaging to address freshness, tamper evidence and limiting access to children.(iii) Standard symbols and warnings where the board shall review symbols and warnings from other jurisdictions where cannabis sales are permitted. As national standards are made available, the board shall plan to adopt national standards.(iv) A prohibition on packaging that is likely to appeal to minors.(18) Requirements that cannabis organizations use standards and practices that align with United States Department of Agriculture and Food and Drug Administration standards, when appropriate for the purposes of this chapter.20250SB0049PN1506 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (19) Procedures for the investigation and enforcement of unregulated and unpermitted cultivation, processing, manufacturing, sale, dispensing or distribution of cannabis or products intended for consumption or inhalation.(20) Procedures for medical professionals in dispensaries. TO BE ACCESSIBLE TO PATIENTS.(21) TESTING STANDARDS.(22) PERMISSIBLE FORMS AND CONCENTRATIONS.(23) RESTRICTIONS NECESSARY TO PROTECT PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY.(24) ENFORCEMENT AGAINST UNPERMITTED CANNABINOID PRODUCTS.(d) Compliance deadline.--A permittee shall have 180 days from the effective date of a new regulation promulgated by the board under this section to comply with the new regulation.(e) Review of current regulations.--When promulgating regulations under this section, the board shall review current regulations promulgated under the Medical Marijuana Act and may implement or revise those regulations.Section 309. Powers and duties of board.(a) General powers.--(1) The board shall have general and sole regulatory authority over the conduct of cannabis organizations and related activities as described in this chapter.(1) THE BOARD SHALL HAVE GENERAL AND SOLE REGULATORY AUTHORITY OVER THE MANUFACTURE, PROCESSING, TESTING, DISTRIBUTION AND SALE OF CANNABIS AND ALL CONSUMABLE CANNABINOID PRODUCTS WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH, INCLUDING PRODUCTS CONTAINING HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOIDS, MARIJUANA-DERIVED CANNABINOIDS AND SYNTHETIC CANNABINOIDS.20250SB0049PN1506 - 37 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The board shall employ individuals, including a chief medical officer and an executive director as provided under section 303(g), as necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the board, who shall serve at the board's pleasure. An employee of the board shall be considered a State employee for purposes of 71 Pa.C.S. Pt. XXV (relating to retirement for State employees and officers). For the purposes of this paragraph, the board shall not be considered an executive or independent agency under the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(3) In addition to employees authorized by the board, each member may employ one special assistant whose classification and compensation shall be established by the board. A special assistant shall be a State employee for purposes of 71 Pa.C.S. Pt. XXV, shall serve at the pleasure of the member and may only be removed by the board for cause.(4) The board shall establish a system of classification and compensation of its employees and shall not be subject to the provisions of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, as to classification and compensation for its employees and conduct its activities consistent with the practices and procedures of Commonwealth agencies.(5) Within 90 days of the effective date of this paragraph, the board shall transmit to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and publish on the board's publicly accessible Internet website the classification system for all employees of the board.20250SB0049PN1506 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) A request for proposal to conduct investigations of employees and applicants under this chapter shall include a requirement that an offeror provide the number of employees of the offeror who will be engaged in the conduct of investigations and who are residents of this Commonwealth and annuitants of a Federal, State or local law enforcement agency. Preference shall be given to an offeror with a substantial number of employees who will be engaged in the conduct of investigations and who are residents of this Commonwealth and annuitants of a Federal, State or local law enforcement agency.(b) Specific powers.--The board shall have the specific power and duty:(1) To adopt, use and alter a corporate seal.(2) To pay or satisfy obligations of the board.(3) To sue or be sued, implead and be impleaded or interplead.(4) To contract and execute instruments as necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the board. Contracts for the purchase of supplies, services and construction shall be for a term not to exceed two years.(5) To sell, transfer, convey and dispose of tangible or intangible property owned by the board.(6) To establish, charge and collect fees and fines as authorized by the Medical Marijuana Act AND THIS ACT.(7) To administer oaths, examine witnesses and issue subpoenas compelling the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents and records or other evidence. This paragraph shall apply to designated officers and employees.(8) To purchase insurance against a loss related to the 20250SB0049PN1506 - 39 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board's property or assets.(8.1) To retain attorneys, accountants, auditors and financial and other experts to render services as necessary. For the purposes of this paragraph, the board shall be considered an independent agency for purposes of the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(9) To require background investigations on applicants, permittees, principals, key employees or permittees under the jurisdiction of the board.(10) To enter into an agreement with the Pennsylvania State Police for the reimbursement of actual costs as approved by the board to the Pennsylvania State Police for the investigations. Investigations shall include information in the possession of the Attorney General.(11) For purposes of enforcement and for purposes of the background investigation, to receive information otherwise protected by 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information).(12) To require prospective and existing employees, independent contractors, applicants and permittees to submit to fingerprinting by the Pennsylvania State Police. The Pennsylvania State Police shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of verifying the identity of the individual and obtaining records of criminal arrests and convictions.(13) To require prospective and existing employees, independent contractors, applicants and permittees to submit photographs consistent with the standards of the Commonwealth Photo Imaging Network.(14) Within six months after the effective date of this 20250SB0049PN1506 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paragraph, in a manner that does not impede the immediate implementation of the duties and responsibilities of the board under this chapter during the immediate two years after the effective date of this paragraph, to develop and implement an affirmative action plan to assure that all persons are accorded equality of opportunity in employment and contracting by the board, its contractors, subcontractors, assignees, lessees, agents, vendors and suppliers.(15) To promulgate regulations pertaining to the operation of the board. The board shall provide the employees necessary for enforcement of this chapter.(16) To transmit to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication each January in the Pennsylvania Bulletin and publish on the board's publicly accessible Internet website a complete list of all persons or entities who applied for or held a cannabis organization permit during the preceding calendar year and all intermediaries, subsidiaries and holding companies thereof and the status of the application or permit.(17) To prepare and, through the Governor, submit annually to the General Assembly an itemized budget consistent with Article VI of The Administrative Code of 1929 consisting of the amounts necessary to be appropriated by the General Assembly out of the accounts established under this chapter required to meet the obligations accruing during the fiscal period beginning July 1 of the following year.(18) If, in any year, appropriations for the administration of this chapter are not enacted by June 30, any funds appropriated for the administration of this chapter 20250SB0049PN1506 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which are unexpended, uncommitted and unencumbered at the end of a fiscal year shall remain available for expenditure by the board or other agency to which they were appropriated until the enactment of appropriation for the ensuing fiscal year.(19) To promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the administration and enforcement of this chapter. Except for temporary regulations authorized under this chapter, regulations shall be adopted as provided under the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law, and the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(20) To award, deny, deny the renewal of, revoke, condition or suspend any permit provided for in this chapter if the board finds in its sole discretion that a permittee, or its officers, employees or agents, have furnished false or misleading information to the board or failed to comply with applicable laws or the rules and regulations of the board and that it would be in the public interest to deny, deny the renewal of, revoke, condition or suspend the permit.(21) Restrict access to confidential information in the possession of the board which has been obtained under this chapter and ensure that the confidentiality of information is maintained and protected. Records shall be retained by the board for seven years.(22) Prescribe and require periodic financial reporting and internal control requirements for all cannabis organizations.(23) Require that each cannabis organization provide to the board its audited annual financial statements, with 20250SB0049PN1506 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 additional detail as the board from time to time shall require, which information shall be submitted not later than 60 90 days after the end of the cannabis organization's fiscal year.(24) Prescribe the procedures to be followed by cannabis organizations for any security breach or diversion event that occurs in the operation of cannabis organizations.(25) Establish procedures for the inspection and certification of compliance of each cannabis organization prior to being deemed operational.(26) Require each cannabis organization permit applicant to provide detailed site plans of its proposed facility which shall be reviewed and approved by the board for the purpose of determining the adequacy of the proposed security and surveillance measures inside and outside the facility. Applicants shall cooperate with the board in making changes to the plans suggested by the board and ensure that the plans as modified and approved are implemented.(27) Consult with members of the Pennsylvania State Police, the Office of Attorney General, State agencies and other persons the board deems necessary for advice regarding the various aspects of the powers and duties imposed on it under this chapter and its jurisdiction over the authorization and operation of cannabis organization facilities.(28) Enter into contracts with persons for the purposes of carrying out the powers and duties of the board under this chapter.(29) Appoint committees and subcommittees as necessary. The following shall apply:20250SB0049PN1506 - 43 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The chairperson of the board may appoint advisory committees that may consist of members, nonmembers, outside experts and staff of the board.(ii) Only a board member may be chairperson of an advisory committee.(iii) An advisory committee or subcommittee may be formed to address and make recommendations on subjects determined by the board, including any of the following topics:(A) Public health and wellness.(B) Community safety and well-being.(C) Judicial and carceral systems.(D) Education.(E) Employment and labor.(F) Business and entrepreneurship.(G) Agriculture and food systems.(H) Medical cannabis program efficiency.(iv) A department, agency, office or other entity of the Commonwealth may cooperate and provide the board or its advisory committees or subcommittees with staff and expertise to assist the board in carrying out the powers and duties under this chapter.(v) Recognized experts in the subject matter of an advisory committee or subcommittee of the board may be appointed to advise and assist the advisory committee or subcommittee by the board.(30) Create a cannabis organization registration. The following shall apply:(i) A cannabis organization representative shall register with the board in a manner prescribed by the 20250SB0049PN1506 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board, which shall include the name, employer or firm, address, telephone number and the cannabis organization being represented including any and all aliases.(ii) A cannabis organization representative shall have an ongoing duty to update its registration information on an ongoing basis.(iii) The cannabis organization list shall be available for public inspection at the offices of the board and on the board's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 310. Confidentiality and public disclosure.(a) Exempt from access.--All personal information obtained by the board relating to agents, patients or purchasers shall be exempt from access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(b) Public records.--The following records are public records and shall be accessible for inspection and duplication in accordance with the Right-to-Know Law:(1) With exceptions for private, security-related and trade secret information, applications for permits submitted by a cannabis organization.(2) Information relating to penalties or other disciplinary actions taken against a cannabis organization or agent by the board for violation of this chapter.Section 311. Unauthorized activities and civil penalties.(a) Unauthorized activities.--In addition to any other penalty provided by Federal or State law, a person who cultivates, processes, distributes, sells or offers for sale cannabis, cannabis concentrates, cannabis flower or any product intended for consumption or inhalation without a permit issued 20250SB0049PN1506 - 45 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the board shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 for each offense. Each day a person engages in unpermitted activity under this subsection shall constitute a separate offense.(A) UNAUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES.--(1) A PERSON MAY NOT DO ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) MANUFACTURE, SELL, OFFER FOR SALE, DISPENSE, DISTRIBUTE OR MARKET AN INTERMEDIATE HEMP-DERIVED PRODUCT AS A FINAL HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCT OR DIRECTLY TO AN END CONSUMER FOR PERSONAL OR HOUSEHOLD USE.(II) MANUFACTURE, SELL, OFFER FOR SALE, DISPENSE, DISTRIBUTE OR MARKET A HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCT THAT IS EXCLUDED FROM THE DEFINITION OF "HEMP."(2) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PENALTY PROVIDED BY FEDERAL OR STATE LAW, A PERSON WHO MANUFACTURES, SELLS OR OFFERS FOR SALE, DISPENSES OR DISTRIBUTES CANNABIS, CANNABIS CONCENTRATES, CANNABIS FLOWER OR ANY PRODUCT INTENDED FOR CONSUMPTION OR INHALATION WITHOUT A PERMIT ISSUED BY THE BOARD SHALL BE SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY NOT TO EXCEED $10,000 FOR EACH OFFENSE. EACH DAY A PERSON ENGAGES IN UNPERMITTED ACTIVITY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL CONSTITUTE A SEPARATE OFFENSE.(b) Enforcement.--The Attorney General, the board, a State or local law enforcement agency or a local government unit may investigate an unpermitted activity under subsection (a) and engage in enforcement measures, including entering into an intergovernmental agreement to prevent the conduct of an unpermitted activity under subsection (a). OR EXERCISE SEARCHES, SEIZURES AND FORFEITURES.(c) Suspension or revocation.--In addition to any other 20250SB0049PN1506 - 46 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 penalty provided by Federal or State law, upon the conduct of a third or subsequent unpermitted activity under subsection (a), a local government unit may suspend or revoke the permit of the person who engaged in the unpermitted activity., REVOKE OR DENY A LICENSE, PERMIT OR OTHER AUTHORIZATION TO CONDUCT BUSINESS WHATSOEVER, ISSUED BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT AND HELD BY THE PERSON OR FOR WHICH THE PERSON HAS MADE APPLICATION.(d) Violations.--A violation of subsection (a) is an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law. All remedies, penalties and authority granted to the Attorney General under that act shall be available for the enforcement of this chapter.(e) Actions.--In addition to the authority granted to the Attorney General under this section, an organization or consumer injured by a violation of subsection (a) may bring an action to enjoin an organization retailing, cultivating, manufacturing, distributing or possessing cannabis without a permit and to recover actual damages sustained. A court shall enter judgment in an amount equal to three times actual damages and may award punitive damages in an amount commensurate with actual damages. The court shall award attorney fees and costs to the prevailing party.Section 312. Cannabis Regulation Fund.(a) Fund established.--The Cannabis Regulation Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury. Money in the fund is appropriated as specified in subsection (c).(b) Source of funds.--Fees payable under this chapter shall be deposited into the fund. The money deposited into the fund may only be used for the purposes specified in this section. Any 20250SB0049PN1506 - 47 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 interest accrued shall be deposited into the fund.(c) Use of proceeds.--After any repayment made under subsection (d), money in the fund is appropriated in accordance with the following percentages:(1) To the board, 55% of the revenue in the fund. Forty percent of the revenue in the fund shall be expended for operations of the board, including outreach efforts and other projects, as required by this chapter. Fifteen percent of the amount in the fund shall be used by the board to establish the following:(i) a program to assist patients with the cost of providing medical marijuana to patients who demonstrate financial hardship or need under this act, and the board shall develop guidelines and procedures to ensure maximum availability to individuals with financial need;(ii) a program to assist patients and caregivers with the cost associated with the waiver or reduction of fees for identification cards under sections 501(c)(5) and 502(a)(2) of the Medical Marijuana Act; and(iii) a program to reimburse caregivers for the cost of providing background checks for caregivers.(2) To the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs, for drug abuse prevention and counseling and treatment services, 10% of the revenue in the fund.(3) To the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency, for distribution to local police departments which demonstrate a need relating to the enforcement of this chapter, 10% of the revenue in the fund.(4) The remainder shall be transferred to the General Fund to provide economic relief to this Commonwealth.20250SB0049PN1506 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Repayment of initial funding.--The board shall repay from the fees and investment earnings of the fund to the General Fund any money appropriated FROM THE GENERAL FUND for the initial planning, organization and administration by the board with respect to the establishment of the program at the time of the original enactment of this act.(e) Transfers.--As soon as practical after the effective date of this subsection, the State Treasurer shall transfer the balance of the Medical Marijuana Program Fund into the Cannabis Regulation Fund.(f) Prohibition.--The Cannabis Regulation Fund shall not be subject to sweeps, administrative charge-backs or any other fiscal or budgetary maneuver that would transfer money from the Cannabis Regulation Fund into any other fund of the Commonwealth.Section 313. Report of board.(a) Issuance.--Eighteen months after the effective date of this subsection and every year on that date thereafter, the board shall issue a report to the Governor and each member of the General Assembly on the general operation of the board and performance of the operations of cannabis entities and permittees, including sales during the previous year, all taxes, fees, fines and other revenues collected and, where appropriate, disbursed, the costs of operation of the board, all hearings conducted and the results of the hearings and other information that the board deems necessary and appropriate.(b) Reports to General Assembly.--The board shall conduct an ongoing review of the operation of this chapter and the impact of cannabis in this Commonwealth, including reviews of other jurisdictions, Federal laws and academic research. The board 20250SB0049PN1506 - 49 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall submit an annual report to the General Assembly by December 30. The report shall be submitted to the Majority Leader and the Minority Leader of the Senate and the Majority Leader and the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the standing committees in the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the standing committees in the House of Representatives with jurisdiction over the board. The report shall be posted by the board on its publicly accessible Internet website.Section 314. Authority.(a) Sole authority.--The board shall have general and sole regulatory authority over the conduct of cannabis or related activities as described in this chapter and shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter. The board shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate its purposes in administering the cannabis program.(b) Granted authority.--An authority granted to a Commonwealth agency or Commonwealth employee or appointee under this chapter shall be given to the Commonwealth agency or employee or appointee empowered to permit, discipline, revoke, regulate or make regulations under this chapter.Section 315. Transfer of authority.(a) Department of Health.--The Department of Health's oversight of the medical marijuana program shall be transferred to the board. All authority, permits, information, documents, databases and necessary information of the medical marijuana program shall be transferred to the board.(b) Process.--The transfer under subsection (a) shall begin on the earlier of 14 days after the effective date of this 20250SB0049PN1506 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection or the day after an interim executive director is confirmed by the Senate and be completed within 180 days. The following shall apply:(1) The board shall exercise the authority and perform the duties of the Department of Health.(2) The executive director shall exercise the authority and perform the duties of the Secretary of Health.(3) Any reference to the Department of Health which concerns the powers or duties specified shall be deemed a reference to the board.(4) Any reference to the Secretary of Health which concerns the powers or duties specified shall be deemed a reference to the executive director.(5) The following are transferred to the board:(i) All personnel, allocations, appropriations, equipment, files, permits, records, contracts, agreements, obligations and other materials which are used, employed or expended by the Department of Health in connection with the functions transferred under this section to the board and as if the contracts, agreements and obligations had been incurred or entered into by the board.(ii) The personnel, appropriations, equipment and other items and material transferred to the board under this section shall include an appropriate portion of the general administrative, overhead and supporting personnel, appropriations, equipment and other material of the Department of Health and shall include, where applicable, Federal grants and money and other benefits from any Federal program.20250SB0049PN1506 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) All personnel transferred under this section shall retain any civil service employment status assigned to the personnel.(6) To provide an efficient and cost-minimizing transition, licenses, contracts, deeds and other official actions of the board shall not be affected by the use of the designation as the Department of Health. The board may continue to use the name "Department of Health" on badges, licenses, contracts, deeds, stationery and other official documents until existing supplies are exhausted or new materials are produced.(7) To provide an efficient and cost-minimizing transition, licenses, contracts, deeds and other official actions of the executive director shall not be affected by the use of the designation as the Secretary of Health. The executive director may continue to use the name "Secretary of Health" on badges, licenses, contracts, deeds, stationery and other official documents until existing supplies are exhausted.SECTION 316. CONSTRUCTION.(A) FEDERAL CONFORMITY SWEEP.--ANY HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCT THAT IS EXCLUDED FROM THE DEFINITION OF "HEMP" UNDER 7 U.S.C. § 1639O (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS), AS AMENDED AND EFFECTIVE, SHALL BE DEEMED "CANNABIS" FOR PURPOSES OF THIS ACT.(B) COMPLIANT HEMP PRODUCTS OUTSIDE BOARD JURISDICTION.--A HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCT THAT MEETS THE DEFINITION OF "HEMP" UNDER THIS ACT, INCLUDING A FINAL HEMP-DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCT CONTAINING NOT MORE THAN 0.4 MILLIGRAMS COMBINED TOTAL PER CONTAINER OF TOTAL TETRAHYDROCANNABINOLS, INCLUDING TETRAHYDROCANNABINOLIC ACID, AND ANY OTHER 20250SB0049PN1506 - 52 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CANNABINOIDS THAT HAVE SIMILAR EFFECTS, OR ARE MARKETED TO HAVE SIMILAR EFFECTS, ON HUMANS OR ANIMALS AS A TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL AS DETERMINED BY THE BOARD, SHALL NOT BE SUBJECT TO REGULATION BY THE BOARD UNDER THIS ACT UNLESS AND UNTIL OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY THE LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.CHAPTER 4(RESERVED)CHAPTER 5PERMITSSection 501. (Reserved).Section 502. (Reserved).Section 503. Warehousing and distribution permit.(a) Issuance.--The WITHIN 180 DAYS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE board shall issue warehousing and distribution permits, which authorize the storage, inventory management and transportation of cannabis and cannabis products between cannabis organizations, to eligible applicants. THE BOARD SHALL ISSUE NO MORE THAN THREE WAREHOUSING AND DISTRIBUTION PERMITS AT A TIME.(b) Scope of permit.--A permit issued under this section shall authorize a permittee to:(1) Store cannabis and cannabis products in secure, compliant facilities.(2) Manage inventory, including tracking and reporting, as required by the board.(3) Transport cannabis and cannabis products between grower/processors, dispensaries and other authorized entities within this Commonwealth.(c) Fees.--(1) A one-time, nonrefundable application fee of $2,500 20250SB0049PN1506 - 53 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $10,000 shall be payable to the board upon submission of the initial application for a permit.(2) An annual renewal fee of $5,000 shall be payable to the board for a permit.(d) Residency requirement.--At least 51% of the ownership interest in the entity applying for a permit must be held by individuals who have been residents of this Commonwealth for at least two consecutive years immediately prior to the application date.(e) Restriction on other permits.--The holder of a WAREHOUSING AND DISTRIBUTION permit, including its owners, principals and operators, may not hold a grower-processor permit or cultivation center permit., CLINICAL REGISTRANT OR DISPENSARY PERMIT OR HAVE A FINANCIAL INTEREST IN AN APPROVED LABORATORY.(f) Employee background checks.--(1) All employees of a permittee shall undergo a criminal history background check conducted by the Pennsylvania State Police prior to employment.(2) A permittee shall submit employee background check results to the board upon request and maintain records for inspection.(g) Regulatory oversight.--The board shall establish and enforce rules governing the permitting, operation and compliance of warehousing and distribution facilities, including:(1) Security protocols for storage and transportation.(2) Inventory tracking and reporting requirements.(3) Compliance with health and safety standards.(h) Inspections.--The board, or a designee, may conduct regular and unannounced inspections of permitted facilities to ensure compliance.20250SB0049PN1506 - 54 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Penalties.--A violation of this section may result in fines or permit suspension or revocation, as determined by the board.(j) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Permit." A permit issued under subsection (a)."Permittee." The holder of a permit.Section 504. Third-party transporter permit.(a) Third-party transporter permit.--The board shall issue delivery permits to qualified third-party transporters to deliver cannabis products on behalf of permitted dispensaries.(A) ISSUANCE.--WITHIN 180 DAYS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE BOARD SHALL ISSUE 15 PERMITS TO QUALIFIED THIRD-PARTY TRANSPORTERS TO DELIVER CANNABIS PRODUCTS ON BEHALF OF PERMITTED DISPENSARIES TO PATIENTS AND CAREGIVERS. THE BOARD MAY ISSUE UP TO 15 ADDITIONAL THIRD-PARTY TRANSPORTER PERMITS ANNUALLY. THE BOARD SHALL NOT REQUIRE PERMITTED DISPENSARIES TO CONTRACT WITH THIRD-PARTY TRANSPORTER PERMITS TO DELIVER CANNABIS PRODUCTS.(b) Eligibility.--An applicant for a permit must be over 21 years of age, POSSESS A VALID DRIVER'S LICENSE, pass a criminal background check and demonstrate compliance with security and operational standards.(C) RESIDENCY REQUIREMENT.--AT LEAST 51% OF THE OWNERSHIP INTEREST IN THE ENTITY APPLYING FOR A PERMIT MUST BE HELD BY INDIVIDUALS WHO HAVE BEEN RESIDENTS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH FOR AT LEAST TWO CONSECUTIVE YEARS IMMEDIATELY PRIOR TO THE APPLICATION DATE.(c) (D) Permit fee.--A third-party transporter shall pay 20250SB0049PN1506 - 55 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 initial fee of $7,500 for a permit and an annual renewal fee of $3,000.(d) (E) Permit duration.--A permit shall be valid for one year and renewable upon compliance verification.(e) Delivery operations.-- (F) OPERATIONS.--(1) Third-party transporters must have a written contract with a permitted dispensary to receive and fulfill delivery orders.(2) Deliveries may only be made to registered medical marijuana patients who are 21 OR CAREGIVERS WHO ARE 21 years of age or older and have a valid medical marijuana card.(3) Deliveries may only be to private residences, excluding college campuses, government facilities or public spaces.(4) A maximum of one delivery per customer per day, with a purchase limit as provided under the Medical Marijuana Act.(5) Deliveries may be made between 8 a.m. and 10 p.m. 8 P.M. daily.(f) (G) Security and compliance.--(1) Each delivery team member shall carry a valid driver's license and State-issued identification badge, presented upon request to law enforcement or regulatory agents.(2) Delivery vehicles shall be staffed by at least two delivery team members, one of whom shall remain with the vehicle at all times.(3) Delivery vehicles shall have no markings indicating cannabis transport and shall include a secure lockbox or cargo area for products.(4) Each delivery team member shall have access to 20250SB0049PN1506 - 56 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 secure communication with the dispensary during transport.(5) Third-party transporters shall use GPS tracking and report delivery schedules, routes and times daily WEEKLY to the board via electronic communication.(6) Third-party transporters shall report vehicle accidents, losses or diversions to the board within 24 hours.(g) (H) Customer verification.--(1) A third-party transporter shall verify the customer's age and identity using a valid government-issued photo ID and a valid medical marijuana card at the time of delivery. (1) A THIRD-PARTY TRANSPORTER OR DISPENSARY SHALL VERIFY A PATIENT'S CERTIFICATION IDENTITY USING A VALID GOVERNMENT-ISSUED PHOTO ID AND A VALID MEDICAL MARIJUANA CARD AT THE TIME OF DELIVERY UTILIZING A TRANSACTION SCAN DEVICE.(2) IF A THIRD-PARTY TRANSPORTER OR DISPENSARY IS DELIVERING TO A CAREGIVER ON BEHALF OF A PATIENT, THE THIRD-PARTY TRANSPORTER OR DISPENSARY SHALL VERIFY THE CAREGIVER'S CERTIFICATION, THEIR DESIGNATION AS A CAREGIVER FOR THE PATIENTS THEY ARE ACCEPTING A DELIVERY FOR USING A VALID GOVERNMENT-ISSUED PHOTO ID AND A VALID MEDICAL MARIJUANA CARD AT THE TIME OF DELIVERY UTILIZING A TRANSACTION SCAN DEVICE.(3) A THIRD-PARTY TRANSPORTER OR DISPENSARY:(I) MAY NOT SELL OR SHARE DATA COLLECTED UTILIZING A TRANSACTION SCAN DEVICE.(II) MAY USE THE DATA COLLECTED UTILIZING A TRANSACTION SCAN DEVICE TO SHOW THE BOARD THAT THE THIRD-PARTY TRANSPORTER OR DISPENSARY IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS ACT.(2) (4) Only the individual who placed the order may 20250SB0049PN1506 - 57 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 receive the delivery.(h) (I) Delivery requirements.--(1) A third-party transporter shall complete a State-approved training program on cannabis delivery, including compliance, safety and customer interaction.(2) Cash or debit card ELECTRONIC payments may be accepted, with transactions recorded electronically for auditing.(3) Products shall be sealed and tamper-evident, with no consumption permitted by delivery personnel.(i) (J) Issuance, renewal and revocation.--The board shall issue, renew and revoke permits in accordance with Chapter 6 of the Medical Marijuana Act.(j) (K) Penalties.--(1) A violation of this section, in addition to any other penalty provided by Federal or State law, shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 for each offense or suspension or revocation of a delivery permit. Each day a person engages in a violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense.(2) The Attorney General, the board, a State or local law enforcement agency or a local government unit may investigate violations of this section and engage in enforcement measures, including entering into an intergovernmental agreement to prevent violations of this section.(k) (L) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Delivery team." Two or more delivery employees staffed for 20250SB0049PN1506 - 58 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a delivery vehicle."Third-party transporter." A permitted entity contracted by a permitted cannabis dispensary to deliver cannabis products to customers. PATIENTS.CHAPTER 6(RESERVED)CHAPTER 7MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 701. Dispensing to patients and caregivers. DISPENSARIES.A dispensary permittee shall have a physician, pharmacist, physician assistant or certified nurse practitioner available, either in person or by synchronous interaction, to verify patient certifications and to consult with patients and caregivers at all times during the hours the dispensary is open to receive patients and caregivers. If a dispensary permittee has more than one separate location, a single physician, pharmacist, physician assistant or a certified registered nurse practitioner may verify patient certifications and consult with patients and caregivers, either in person or by synchronous interaction, at up to three locations if the locations are licensed under one permit. The permittee shall have in place a plan to demonstrate and maintain compliance with the labor laws of the Commonwealth. A physician, a pharmacist, a physician assistant or a certified registered nurse practitioner shall, prior to assuming duties under this paragraph, successfully complete the course established in section 301(a)(6) of the Medical Marijuana Act. A physician may not issue a certification to authorize patients to receive medical marijuana or otherwise treat patients at the dispensary.20250SB0049PN1506 - 59 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(1) A DISPENSARY PERMITTEE SHALL HAVE A PHYSICIAN, PHARMACIST, PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT OR CERTIFIED NURSE PRACTITIONER AVAILABLE, EITHER IN PERSON OR BY SYNCHRONOUS INTERACTION TO CONSULT WITH PATIENTS AND CAREGIVERS AT ALL TIMES DURING THE HOURS THE DISPENSARY IS OPEN TO RECEIVE PATIENTS AND CAREGIVERS. IF A DISPENSARY PERMITTEE HAS MORE THAN ONE SEPARATE LOCATION, A SINGLE PHYSICIAN, PHARMACIST, PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT OR A CERTIFIED REGISTERED NURSE PRACTITIONER MAY CONSULT WITH PATIENTS AND CAREGIVERS, EITHER IN PERSON OR BY SYNCHRONOUS INTERACTION, AT UP TO THREE LOCATIONS IF THE LOCATIONS ARE LICENSED UNDER ONE PERMIT. THE PERMITTEE SHALL HAVE IN PLACE A PLAN TO DEMONSTRATE AND MAINTAIN COMPLIANCE WITH THE LABOR LAWS OF THE COMMONWEALTH. A PHYSICIAN, A PHARMACIST, A PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT OR A CERTIFIED REGISTERED NURSE PRACTITIONER SHALL, PRIOR TO ASSUMING DUTIES UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH, SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETE THE COURSE ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 301(A)(6) OF THE MEDICAL MARIJUANA ACT. A PHYSICIAN MAY NOT ISSUE A CERTIFICATION TO AUTHORIZE PATIENTS TO RECEIVE MEDICAL MARIJUANA OR OTHERWISE TREAT PATIENTS AT THE DISPENSARY.(2) A DISPENSARY SHALL MAINTAIN VIDEO SURVEILLANCE EQUIPMENT IN CONTINUOUS OPERATION, INCLUDING MOTION ACTIVATED VIDEO SURVEILLANCE EQUIPMENT WITH PRE-MOTION AND POST-MOTION DETECTION CAPABILITIES.SECTION 702. GROWER/PROCESSORS.(A) REMEDIATION.--A GROWER/PROCESSOR MAY APPLY SOLVENT-BASED EXTRACTION METHODS AND PROCESSES TO MEDICAL MARIJUANA PLANTS THAT HAVE FAILED A TEST CONDUCTED BY AN APPROVED LABORATORY AT HARVEST, SUBJECT TO THE FOLLOWING:20250SB0049PN1506 - 60 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) THE TEST FAILURE SHALL BE LIMITED TO YEAST AND MOLD.(2) THE MEDICAL MARIJUANA PRODUCT MUST PASS A FINAL PROCESSED TEST UNDER SECTION 704 OF THE MEDICAL MARIJUANA ACT.(B) VIDEO SURVEILLANCE EQUIPMENT.--GROWER/PROCESSORS SHALL MAINTAIN VIDEO SURVEILLANCE EQUIPMENT IN CONTINUOUS OPERATION, INCLUDING MOTION-ACTIVATED VIDEO SURVEILLANCE EQUIPMENT WITH PRE-MOTION AND POST-MOTION DETECTION.Section 702 703. Repeals.Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of section 308(c)(12).(2) Section 701 of the Medical Marijuana Act is repealed.(3) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (4) is necessary to effectuate the addition of section 701.(4) Section 801(b) of the Medical Marijuana Act is repealed.(5) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (6) is necessary to effectuate the addition of section 312.(6) Section 902 of the Medical Marijuana Act is repealed.(7) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (8) is necessary to effectuate the addition of section 303.(8) Chapter 12 of the Medical Marijuana Act is repealed.Section 703 704. Effective date.20250SB0049PN1506 - 61 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250SB0049PN1506 - 62 - 1